Mississippi, session 2026, HB4080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Chapter 941, Local and Private Laws of 2022, is amended as follows: Section 1.  (1)  The Board of Supervisors of Jackson County, Mississippi, in its discretion, may contribute funds annually in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), out of any available county funds, to the Junior Auxiliary of Pascagoula-Moss Point, a nonprofit organization that is dedicated to community improvement by meeting the needs of children, youth and families. (2)  The provisions of this section shall be repealed on July 1, * * *2026 2030. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.